Tennessee, session 114, HB2229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-501(h)(2), is amended by
deleting "There shall be no release eligibility" and substituting "Except as provided in subsection
(hh), there shall be no release eligibility".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-501, is amended by adding
the following as new subsections:
HB2229
011364
- 1 -

(hh)
(1) Notwithstanding subdivision (h)(2) or another law to the contrary, a
person committing first degree murder, on or after July 1, 1995, and before July
1, 2020, and receiving a sentence of imprisonment for life is eligible for parole
after serving twenty-five (25) calendar years if the person fulfills the following
criteria with the maximum reduction not to exceed thirty-five (35) years:
(A) Ten (10) years must be deducted from the inmate's parole
eligibility date for each sustained period of ten (10) consecutive years
without a Class A violent disciplinary infraction. If a Class A violent
disciplinary infraction occurs after a ten-year period of good conduct, then
any previously accrued credit under this subdivision (hh)(1)(A) is forfeited,
and a new ten-year period of good conduct must be completed to regain
eligibility for this credit;
(B) Ten (10) years must be deducted from the inmate's parole
eligibility date for each sustained period of ten (10) consecutive years
without a drug-related disciplinary infraction. If a drug-related disciplinary
infraction occurs after a ten-year period of being drug-free, then any
previously accrued credit under this subdivision (hh)(1)(B) is forfeited, and
a new ten-year period of being drug-free must be completed to regain
eligibility for this credit;
(C) Ten (10) years must be deducted from the inmate's parole
eligibility date upon the successful completion of an accredited
postsecondary education program and the attainment of an associate
degree, a bachelor's degree, or a graduate degree from an institution
recognized by the state of Tennessee, including, but not limited to,
- 2 - 011364

programs offered within correctional facilities by institutions such as
Dyersburg State Community College, Rhodes College, or the University
of Memphis; and
(D) Five (5) years must be deducted from the inmate's parole
eligibility date upon the successful completion of all of the following
programs offered by the Tennessee department of correction or its
accredited partners:
(i) A career exploration class;
(ii) A victim impact class;
(iii) Cognitive behavior therapy (CBT) or a similar cognitive
restructuring program;
(iv) A family unification class; and
(v) An early intervention class, if the class is deemed
appropriate by the department.
(2) As used in this subsection (hh):
(A) "Class A violent disciplinary infractions" means:
(i) Assault on staff with or without a weapon;
(ii) Assault on another offender with or without a weapon;
(iii) Threatening staff or another offender;
(iv) Murder or attempted murder of staff or another
offender; and
(v) Rape or attempted rape of staff or another offender;
and
(B) "Drug-related disciplinary infractions" means:
- 3 - 011364

(i) Possession or usage of an unauthorized Schedule 1 or
Schedule II controlled substance; and
(ii) Selling or distribution of an unauthorized Schedule I or
Schedule II controlled substance.
(3) The credits earned under this subsection (hh) run parallel to any good
behavior or program credits awarded pursuant to other provisions of this title and
must be specifically applied toward the calculation of parole eligibility under this
subsection (hh).
(4) This subsection (hh) is retroactive and applies to any person
sentenced to imprisonment for life for the offense of first-degree murder
committed on or after July 1, 1995, and before July 1, 2020, who, as of July 1,
2026, has already met one (1) or more of the criteria outlined in subdivision
(hh)(1). The department of correction shall review the records of all such
inmates and adjust the inmate's parole eligibility dates accordingly.
(5) If a person has been sentenced to life imprisonment for the offense of
first degree murder committed on or after July 1, 1995, and before July 1, 2020,
and the person also has other sentences running consecutively, then all of the
person's sentences must be deemed to run concurrent to the life sentence if the
person meets the criteria outlined in subdivision (hh)(1) and is granted parole.
(6) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary, upon an
inmate's fulfillment of all criteria outlined in this subsection (hh), the board of
parole shall grant the inmate parole. The board has no discretion to deny parole
based on the seriousness of the crime or a perceived risk of nonconformity to
release conditions.
- 4 - 011364

(ii) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary, a sentence of
imprisonment for life automatically expires after the person has served forty (40)
calendar years. An individual convicted of first degree murder and sentenced to
imprisonment for life must not remain incarcerated for more than forty (40) years if
parole has not been granted.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 011364